Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.370

Land surveys.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, the board of county commissioners, through a surveyor employed by it shall execute all surveys of land that may be required by the county. The certificate of the surveyor so employed of any survey made of lands within the county shall be presumptive evidence of the facts therein contained.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.370. Prior: (i) 1895 c 77 s 3; RRS s 4144. (ii) 1895 c 77 s 4; RRS s 4145.]